Utah statutes.
53-2-404.   State costs for emergency disaster services.
(1)  Subject to this section and Section 53-2-403, the division shall use
monies described in Subsection 53-2-403(1)(d)(i) to fund costs to the state of
emergency disaster services.
(2)  Monies paid by the division under this section to government entities and
private persons providing emergency disaster services are subject to Title
63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code.
